New York, session 2025-2026, A6848.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 500-a of the correction law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 2-w to read as follows: 3 2-w. The Schuyler county correctional facility may also be used for 4 the detention of persons under arrest being held for arraignment in any 5 court located in the county of Schuyler. 6 § 2. Section 500-c of the correction law is amended by adding a new 7 subdivision 29 to read as follows: 8 29. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in the county of 9 Schuyler, all the provisions of this section shall equally apply in any 10 case where the sheriff is holding a person under arrest for arraignment 11 prior to commitment, as if such person has been judicially committed to 12 the custody of the sheriff and such person may be held in the Schuyler 13 county correctional facility. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately, provided, however, that 15 the amendments to section 500-c of the correction law, made by section 16 two of this act, shall not affect the repeal of such section and shall 17 be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08902-01-5